test/src/morphology/V-sams_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - самс: # Verb 'to arrive' - full paradigm
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: сан
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: сат
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: сай
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: сатама
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: сатада
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: сайхть

     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: сань
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: сать
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сась
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: саме
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: саде
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: састь
     
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: салень
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: салеть
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: саль
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: салеме
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: саледе
     самс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: сальхть
     
     самс+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: сак
     самс+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: сада
     
     самс+V+IV+Opt+ScSg1: сазан
     самс+V+IV+Opt+ScSg2: сазат
     самс+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: саза
     самс+V+IV+Opt+ScPl1: састама
     самс+V+IV+Opt+ScPl2: састада
     самс+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: саст
